Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 29
PHYSICAL LABOR BY INMATES

Cross references:

For other provisions concerning work by inmates, see § 17-20-117 and article 24 of this title.

Section

17-29-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that the people of this state benefit from an inmate rehabilitation and work program that promotes that person's successful rehabilitation, reentry, and reintegration into the community; that the executive director has custody over inmates who could benefit from such a program; that such a program provides work skills and instills a work ethic in inmates, thereby facilitating their readjustment to society. To these ends, it is the purpose of this article 29 to create within the department internal and external rehabilitation and work programs for inmates sentenced to the department. The executive director or the executive director's designee may appoint facility wardens, responsible for the administration of correctional facilities, to perform the duties and functions set forth in this article 29.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 965, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 28, § 5, effective March 20.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 848, § 46, effective May 24.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-050), ch. 51, p. 246, § 12, effective March 30.

17-29-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Able-bodied offender" has the same meaning as set forth in section 17-24-103 (1).

"Work program" means a work program established pursuant to the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 965, § 1, effective June 10.

17-29-103. Executive director to establish work program.

The executive director may establish an intensive labor work program at all facilities, utilizing the physical labor of able-bodied offenders, which will be directed toward the reclamation and maintenance of land and resources, including but not limited to those of any federal, state, or local governmental agency or nonprofit agency within this state, and which will be administered by the various wardens responsible for the administration of any correctional facility. Such intensive labor work program shall be operated on an incentive basis so that an offender assigned to the intensive labor work program who demonstrates that he or she is willing to modify his or her behavioral patterns, to cooperate in his or her rehabilitation, and to learn both a work ethic and a job skill becomes eligible for reassignment from the intensive labor work program.

Immediately after the evaluation and diagnosis required by section 16-11-308 (2), C.R.S., and initial placement at a correctional facility, every able-bodied offender may, by departmental classification action, be assigned to and shall participate in the intensive labor work program for a period of not less than thirty days; except that the executive director or the wardens responsible for the administration of correctional facilities may waive or delay an offender's initial assignment to the intensive labor work program for the good of the department. Offenders assigned to the intensive labor work program will be compensated at a rate set in accordance with the regulations of the department concerning offender pay, including but not limited to provisions concerning deductions and reimbursement for care claims.

The executive director is specifically authorized to assign such other able-bodied offenders whose behavior is inconsistent with the rules established by the executive director or the executive director's designee to the intensive labor work program for such periods of time as may best serve the offenders and assist the executive director in the management of correctional facilities under the supervision of the executive director. Eligibility for reassignment from the intensive labor work program to such educational or vocational work programs as are consistent with the diagnosis and evaluation conducted pursuant to article 40 of this title will be determined by departmental classification action after reviewing the offender's willingness to modify behavioral patterns, to commit to cooperating in rehabilitation, and to learn both a work ethic and a job skill. Offenders assigned to the intensive labor work program pursuant to this section will also be compensated at a rate set in accordance with the regulations concerning offender pay promulgated by the department.

The executive director shall establish rules to implement this article.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 966, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 28, § 6, effective March 20.

L. 2000:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 848, § 47, effective May 24.

17-29-104. Offenders in work program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 966, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 95:

Entire section repealed, p. 876, § 10, effective July 1.

17-29-105. Minimum security off-grounds work programs - authorized.

The executive director, in collaboration with the division of correctional industries, may establish an external work program for any appropriate medium, minimum, and minimum-restrictive inmates. The purpose of the program is to provide employment opportunities for such inmates, to reinforce the rehabilitation of such inmates, and to provide inmates with the necessary skills and appropriate work ethics in reentering the work force and their communities. Under the program, inmates may be assigned to appropriate work assignments through employment agreements with any federal, state, or local governmental agency; nonprofit agency; or private person or entity. The executive director shall determine appropriate work assignments. Employment agreements must comply with criteria established by the executive director pursuant to section 17-20-115; except that such criteria may include but is not limited to the following requirements:

That a requesting agency outline in detail any work to be performed by inmates, the period of time for completing the project, and the respective responsibilities of the requesting agency and the department of corrections in connection with the project agreement;

That a requesting agency provide any necessary materials, equipment, and transportation or defray operational costs of state vehicles;

That appropriate security be provided at all times. In connection with this requirement, agencies may contract with the department of corrections for the department to provide such security.

That a requesting agency ensure that any person who supervises an inmate in connection with a work project be trained by department of corrections personnel to supervise correctional inmates. Such training may be provided by department of corrections personnel.

That the number of inmates supervised by one person not exceed ten;

That a requesting agency comply with any reporting requirements established by the executive director in connection with an off-grounds work project and the inmates participating in such project;

That an inmate receive security clearance to leave a correctional facility by the classification officer or committee and receive approval from the executive director;

That inmates are compensated at the state minimum wage, in accordance with the provisions of this title 17, and with the department inmate pay regulation provisions with respect to deductions.

Repealed.

The executive director may appoint one or more designees to perform the duties and functions set forth in this section.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 876, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

IP(1) amended, p. 849, § 48, effective May 24.

L. 2022:

IP(1) and (1)(h) amended and (2) repealed, (SB 22-050), ch. 51, p. 246, § 13, effective March 30.